src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuj_gt-norm.yaml
     туй+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: туйясныскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: туйястӧгныс
     туй+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: туйяснысла
     туй+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: туйяссяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: туйясаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: туйяссьыныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: туйясаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [туйясныслань, туйясланьныс]
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [туйяссяньныс, туйясныссянь]
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: туйясӧдныс
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: туйястіныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: туйясӧдзныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: туйясланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: туйясланьсьыныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: туйясланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: туйясланьсяньныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: туйясланьӧдныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprTra+PxPl3: туйясланьтіныс
     туй+N+Pl+AprTer+PxPl3: туйясланьӧдзныс
